Utah statutes.
3-1-19.   Association not in restraint of trade -- Right to disseminate
information.
(1)  No association complying with the terms hereof shall be deemed to be a
conspiracy, or a combination in restraint of trade, or an illegal monopoly; or
be deemed to have been formed for the purpose of lessening competition or
fixing prices arbitrarily, nor shall the contracts between the association and
its members, or any agreement authorized in this act, be construed as an
unlawful restraint of trade, or as part of a conspiracy or combination to
accomplish an improper or illegal purpose or act.
(2)  An association may acquire, exchange, interpret and disseminate to its
members, to other cooperative associations, and otherwise, past, present, and
prospective crop, market, statistical, economic, and other similar information
relating to the business of the association, either directly or through an
agent created or selected by it or by other associations acting in conjunction
with it.
(3)  An association may advise its members in respect to the adjustment of
their current and prospective production of agricultural commodities and its
relation to the prospective volume of consumption, selling prices and existing
or potential surplus, to the end that every market may be served from the most
convenient productive areas under a program of orderly marketing that will
assure adequate supplies without undue enhancement of prices or the
accumulation of any undue surplus.
